Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2216XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 195 Section 1. Section 717B.3A, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2025, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 4. A person who commits animal torture is guilty of an 3 aggravated misdemeanor a class âDâ felony . 4 5. Notwithstanding subsection 4 , a person who commits 5 animal torture is guilty of a class âDâ âCâ felony if the 6 person has previously been convicted of committing animal 7 abuse pursuant to section 717B.2 , animal neglect punishable 8 as a serious misdemeanor or aggravated misdemeanor pursuant 9 to section 717B.3 , animal torture pursuant to this section , 10 injury to or interference with a police service dog pursuant to 11 section 717B.9 , bestiality pursuant to section 717C.1 , or an 12 act involving a contest event prohibited in section 717D.2 . 13